Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1572
Discovery of property of debtor; disposition by judge.

The judge may order any property of the judgment debtor, not exempt by law, in the hands of either himself or any other person or corporation, or due to the judgment debtor, to be applied towards the satisfaction of the judgment.

R.S.1867, Code § 541, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8120;

C.S.1922, § 9056;

C.S.1929, § 20-1574;

R.S.1943, § 25-1572.

This section was not amended by act exempting ninety per cent of wages, and applies to proceedings against debtor in aid of execution. Live Stock Nat. Bank v. Jackson, 137 Neb. 161, 288 N.W. 515 (1939).

Order may be enforced by the ordinary legal methods of procedure. In re Havlik, 45 Neb. 747, 64 N.W. 234 (1895).